Good evening.
Thank you all very much for coming.'
It's really wonderful to see such"
a great, large, enthusiastic, smiling group of people.'
The last couple of weeks have been really wonderful'
in the school--
really a great set of lectures.
It was special to hear Luisa Lambri and last night Tomas'
Koolhaas with the film.
And of course tonight, with Rahul,'
I think it's a really great combination of presentations."
Rem will actually be here in person on Monday'
to present his studio.
And we will have Iwan Baan on Tuesday.'
And there's actually a GSD event in Chicago,"
for those of you who are there, on Thursday.'
And the following week, Simon Allford, Clare Lyster,'
Mason White, and a number of faculty and students'
will also participate at an event on October 3rd,'
so lots of things to look forward to.'
When you consider the work of most architects'
or urban designers, there is often a great deal'
of consistency in the work.
You see work that has often a great deal'
of stylistic similarity.
Of course, in the work of Rahul Mehrotra,'
there's also a lot of consistency."
But it's interesting when you see"
this amazing, beautiful exhibition that's"
out there put together by Rahul, his team, Dan'
Borelli, and others from the GSD,'
to see that there is a body of work that starts with toilets'
in the slums to a project for housing'
elephants to conservation projects,'
including those for the Taj Mahal,'
to a building in a small Swiss city for Novartis,'
and a new library for the campus of his own alma mater at CEPT'
in Ahmedabad.
There is, in a way, a phenomenal diversity'
and incredible breadth of work that in many respects makes'
Rahul India's contemporary version of the Renaissance man,"
I think, with all these things that you're doing."
In addition to all these projects,'
Rahul is working as an architect, as a planner,'
as a conservation consultant, an academic, and author.'
And the combination of all these different talents,'
these different interests, I think,'
are very much in evidence in the exhibition, which is also'
named "Soft Thresholds."
Apart from, in a sense, transcending'
the boundaries between these different activities'
and different disciplines, these kinds of expertise,'
in many ways, it seems that the soft thresholds'
of the exhibition is also a threshold'
across different disciplines, different cultures, religions,'
issues of legality.
And in some sense, this idea of working'
across these different disciplines'
has been at the heart of what I think'
Rahul has done during the time that he's been here"
at the GSD as a professor in the Department of Urban Planning'
and Design, as the chair of the department, what he did,'
and to really utilize this collaboration'
between the various activities of the school,'
but also of the university, working'
with a number of colleagues.
We have Professor Tarun Khanna here.'
He's worked with Professor Diana Eck on the Kumbh"
Mela and other things to actually continue'
this work of friendship, of collaboration with many people,'
And of course his significant pedagogic research on questions'
of urbanization under the rubric of extreme urbanism, which'
has been in progress for the last few years.'
I'm really delighted that we have Rahul Mehrotra among us"
and that he is now back after a wonderful sabbatical year, full'
of energy, full of verve, ready to continue'
all his research, his pedagogy, and to be amongst us,'
and for us to really benefit from all his foresight.'
So, please welcome Rahul Mehrotra.'
[applause]
Thank you very much, Mohsen.
That was a very kind and lovely introduction.'
Thank you.
I'm touched.
And good evening.
And thank you all for being here for this lecture.'
For me, it's a real honor to be speaking to you"
but also exhibiting the work here at the GSD gallery.'
I graduated exactly 30 years ago.'
And so, the process of putting together this show'
has been one of introspection, reflection, and also emotional.'
Because essentially what the exhibition for me captures'
is what I feel were the most important or relevant things'
that I engaged with in the last decades.'
I'm also very happy that a number of people"
here in the audience today have been'
part of these conversations and supported these efforts'
through the decades.
So, thank you all.
For the exhibition, I want to just take a minute'
to thank the GSD, to Mohsen in particular,'
for having supported this effort.'
It's a huge support.
And particularly to Dan and David'
for their amazing team and the tremendous effort'
and commitment they put into make these exhibitions happen.'
One sees them emerging, but one doesn't"
realize what goes behind them.
To Kate, who lead a team of students'
to work with Dan, [inaudible],, Ruben, and Yuan,'
and the installation team, which again, you know,'
one sees in the gallery every two months'
people who look like artists, very committed, making things,'
and they disappear and these wonderful things emerge.'
But they were really a wonderful set of people,'
and I really thank them all.
And Maggie, lastly, who captured and edited my interviews'
on these video installations that she's done,"
which were a fantastic process for me.'
And she just did an amazing job.
So, thank you all.
The last time I spoke here at the GSD'
in the Piper a year ago--
and I think some of you were here--'
I focused on cities and urban design.'
And this time I focused, when speaking to Mohsen'
about the exhibition, on architecture,'
but of course with its intersection with the city.'
And that\'s why I\'ve called it "Working in Mumbai--'
Soft Thresholds" as the title of the exhibition.'
Because the city is truly, I believe,'
born on my approach and values and the values that'
are brought to bear, so to speak,'
on the practice, the profession, the craft of architecture.'
From the time I worked here on my thesis--'
this is my MAUD thesis, '87, with Professor Peter Rowe--"
now coming back here to teach for me'
has yet kept the city really omnipresent in my references,'
pursuits as an architect, and as a teacher.'
Sometimes in tangible ways when one is engaged directly'
with this as a site of our operation,'
as a studio instructor.
But in other times, the presence of the city'
has somehow been intangible, implicit perhaps.'
And so today I'm going to share with you some"
of what this relationship with the city, my city of Mumbai,'
has come to influence in terms of my own production'
as an architect working in India,'
and influenced our concerns and engagements, which'
are sort of triangulated between the practice of architecture,'
urban design conservation, interests in landscape'
architecture, as Mohsen so beautifully'
put in his introduction.
So I've organized the talk in two sections."
And the first I'll share with you"
a few issues that are central, in a sense,'
to things that bother me.
They're by no means very finely articulated."
Many other disciplines articulate these issues'
in much more nuanced ways.
But their issues that one carries around in one's"
head when one designs.
And the second part will be a series of projects--'
I'll slip into those quite easily--"
where I'll share with you their design logic,"
materiality, et cetera.
And of course, the connections between the two'
I'll leave to you and the explicit connections"
I've represented more accurately,"
I think, more explicitly in the exhibition.'
So I think the first issue that I think is really important'
for us-- and this is talking about India,'
but I would say that we have the same concerns here'
in the United States--
which is equity and social justice.'
And these are looming issues.
And I mean, what does this mean for us as designers?'
And perhaps it's going to be the most important issues"
in the coming years, I believe.
Because besides the disruptions that globalization has caused,'
it is the drive of capital that we all'
know in its form has been detrimental,'
I believe, to the values we've brought"
to bear on our environments.
And now we are doing the mop up, clean up'
act, through many efforts that we are making.'
And I've spoken at length of what"
I've called the architecture of impatient capital"
and the inherent impatience of capital'
to drive us towards a vendor-driven, autonomous'
object.
To my mind, it's clear that this free running capitalism"
will never help resolve this inherent contradiction'
about our aspirations to create green buildings, socially'
inclined in human environments, while as architects'
simultaneously pandering to capital and the forms'
it demands.
And this is a disjuncture that we all live with,'
and I think it's been troubling.
And I by no means have the answer.'
But it's been something of concern."
Steven McCurry's wonderful image from Mumbai"
that captures the human condition in some ways.'
Or in the more recent book by Wolfgang Streeck,'
the book that's called How Will Capitalism Fail,"
he has said, to quote him, "Capitalism'
can no longer turn private vice into public benefits.'
Its existence as a self-reproducing, sustainable,'
predictable, and legitimate social order has ended.'
Capitalism has become more capitalist than good for it."'
Or to just go back to the origins, which'
is to quote Karl Marx, who said of capitalism--'
and to quote Karl Marx, he said, "Capitalism'
has conjured up some gigantic means'
of production and exchange.
That is like the sorcerer who is no longer able to control'
the power of the netherworld whom'
he has called up by his spell."
And we are being as disrupted by the floods and all of this'
that you see on this image--
I shall say no more--
in India.
And this is the new brand in Mumbai, that building,'
which is gold gilded-- it's actually gold plated--"
is being built in the context of Mumbai.'
And so you begin to start seeing this extreme.'
Spatial iniquity is critical.
As Charles Correa said, to quote him,'
"Today the amount of urban space one controls'
is directly proportional to one's status or income"
it has no connection to actual family size.'
In fact, poorer people most often have larger families.'
This space differential, therefore,'
cannot be justified in human terms, but only economic ones."'
In Australia, in urban areas, at least'
in the 1980s, something I verified'
a few months ago in Sydney, every family'
could have no more than a quarter acre.'
Australia was locked into spatially equality,'
and thus clearly a society, I believe, that detests elitism.'
But equity is not a quantitative measure alone.'
It has a subjective dimension of access,'
sometimes perceived access or an illusion of equity perhaps.'
Plot divisions in the very fabric of a city speak to this'
and can be great contributors to this, and by extension'
architecture.
And I think these are the kinds of questions'
that we may have to make the connections when we are'
defining urban form architecture and our own place in being'
instrumental in the world.
This is an image from a project we've done,"
which I'll talk about in a minute."
But to just evoke something Martha Chen teaches the Kennedy'
School, and is someone who works on informal economy,'
she has really articulated this beautifully.'
And she's advocated that in the context of economy."
And to quote Martha, "What is needed most fundamentally'
is a new economic paradigm, a model of a hybrid economy'
that embraces the traditional and the modern,'
the small scale and the big scale, the informal'
and the formal.
What is needed is an economic model'
that allows the smallest units and the least powerful workers'
to operate alongside the largest units and the most'
powerful economic players."
So these become interesting inspirational'
or nourishing and emblematic of what we could set up'
as these sort of questions.
Because I think the reason I bring'
this up is because this extends then'
to the debates about sustainability'
as we carry them out.
Because what sustainability has come down to-- and maybe'
I'm simplifying this-- is it's become a chemical"
and mechanical fix for any problem perpetuated and driven'
by a green industry.
And the crucial questions that are absent'
have to do with spatial arrangements.'
You don't see that being discussed adequately."
How do you make space a social condenser,'
an armature to foster and facilitate social connection,'
not hard thresholds that separate?'
But here, the human dimension becomes,'
I think, important, at least in my observation.'
This has been a lot missing and absent'
from the debates about sustainability.'
And I believe that is frightening.'
Pluralism and coexistence also becomes an interesting issue'
that we have to grapple with.
Its coexistence of different forms'
is inevitable in a democracy, like the one in India,'
but around the world.
And the collisions between differing forms'
of urbanism in close adjacency is a reality.'
Thus dissipating these polarities'
and softening thresholds between these disparate forms'
of urbanism are an essential design challenge.'
Facilitating the connections and networks between diverse forms'
is one way to promote the synergistic dependency.'
The questions that come to mind, for example, again,'
in trying to make this bridge for us'
to articulate these problems in ways that we as designers can'
respond is can borders be deconstructed and softened?'
Can boundaries be dissipated spatially?'
Could this become the basis for a rational discussion'
about coexistence, or is the resulting urbanism'
inherently paradoxical?
Is the coexistence of these differing forms'
and their respective states of physical utopia and dystopia'
inevitable?
Can the spatial configuration or how this simultaneity occurs'
be formally imagined?
Or is it again inevitable that cities'
will be molded in a singular image, where architecture'
is the remarkable but singular spectacle of the city?'
So I think some of the research that Mohsen'
was referring to on ephemeral urbanism, et cetera,'
is concerned with these questions.'
So what I've so far described to you"
is the spheres of our concern.
So how do we make a productive overlap'
between the spheres of our concern and the spheres,'
or our direct or indirect influence?'
And I think this becomes a very critical question for us'
as designers.
Otherwise, we live in two worlds.'
We cannot synthesize this.
Because as architects, we are aware and concerned'
about many issues, like the ones I describe,'
from the societal to the planetary scales,'
and ranging from poverty and public health'
to urban violence and climate change.'
More often than not, our sphere of influence'
doesn't empower us to address any"
of these issues in a tangible manner.'
Across the design professions, a frustration,'
I believe, to our attempts to engage with these problems is'
palpable.
Entire disciplinary practices are'
in dangers of being dissipated because they can't move"
beyond expressing and articulating'
or representing these concerns.
And you know, this is an over-quoted statement here'
by our own Professor Kayden, who famously'
says, "To design is human, and to implement divine."'
And by extension, for me, it would'
be, to be concerned is human and to be able to influence divine.'
But most importantly, these narratives really'
illuminate the narrow circumspection'
of the architect's territory of operation"
in the business-as-usual models of practice.'
It also sheds light on ways to better understand the site,'
as mediated through and embedded within a larger'
scale of economic, social, and political process.'
And I think it's through this broader scope designers"
can potentially have a more far-reaching, progressive'
social impact beyond the imagined sites of our projects.'
And so, for us, using the city as a generator of the practice,'
understanding the meta-narratives that'
are critical for situating the object or the building'
in this broader landscape, is somewhat aspirational.'
And so, in order to do that, I think'
a fundamental question is, we talk'
about the practice of architecture,'
but what is the architecture of practice,'
the models of engagement?
And I think these need to vary.
So in the way Mohsen described the varying kinds'
of engagements which have a consistency, maybe,'
in the values of the aspirational dimension'
might not necessarily be cohesive'
as we see it in a narrow way of an aesthetic.'
And I think that comes from different ways,'
because you then engage with different protocols,'
depending on the different models that you're"
sort of being part of.
And so, you know, we look at--
this is what we engage with, and this is important.'
We do that.
I'm going to show you some projects."
We also, at the other end of the spectrum,'
begin to look at advocacy practices, self-initiated work'
with NGOs, alternate practices.
But really, I think the most effective'
would be bringing it together.
And the mainstream as we see it is institutions, corporates,'
developers, government in India, faith-based sort'
of large campuses, et cetera.
But this synthesis is something that--'
otherwise we tend to live in one or the other worlds.'
And architects then take a position.'
And once you create that binary in your mind'
and you are wedded or committed to a singular mode of practice,'
it becomes hard to navigate across the spectrum'
of potential constituencies that you would engage with,'
because the protocols and practices are different.'
So we often talk about clients in many of our discussions.'
And I think in our practice, one of the things'
we have consciously done is for every project unpacked this.'
Because we feel every project actually has patrons,'
it has clients, and it has users.'
Sometimes these collapse into one, but sometimes they get'
differentiated.
And the projects I'm going to show you,"
I'll kind of highlight this.
Because recognizing this, I think, helps us then'
not only engage with and define in our minds'
a constituent group that we want to be responding to,'
but gives us a better pulse for the condition.'
But it also informs us about the very protocols and processes,'
and therefore the kinds of models of practice'
that we might want to engage with.'
And for me, the books is very much a part of the practice.'
All of these are not scholarly, as you can see in the exhibit.'
Sometimes they are catalogs.
Sometimes it's legislation.
But it is a response, then, to identifying'
the different constituent groups that one has to engage with,'
because one has broken what is otherwise the singular'
definition of a client into patrons, users, and clients.'
And these become a way of creating partnerships,'
collaborations, friendships which'
serve to keep the conversation on issues'
and engagement with work alive, because sometimes,'
as you will see in some of the projects,'
these go over a decade.
And then the publications have their own life,'
because they go out in the world and influence other people,'
perhaps, and expand that sphere of influence.'
Because finally, I think, it really, in my mind--'
and this is the last issue I'll touch upon--"
which is that if we don't find agency,"
or we don't find ways of collapsing"
the spheres of our concern and the sphere of our influence'
and agency disappears, we basically'
break down as a profession.
And I think that is the looming crisis.'
I may be exaggerating it, but I think it's worth flagging out."
And so in different conditions, this'
plays itself out differently.
So for homes, single family homes or weekend'
homes, which is what practices start out with, this is one.'
This collapses.
And that's where they become frictionless projects,"
because the patron, the client, and the user'
usually is a couple at most.
So, the issues are different.
You might argue about how many drawers you have in a kitchen'
or if the door should open left or right.'
But the basic moves are frictionless,'
because it's collapsed into one entity."
And so we have done a number of houses'
which are done in Mumbai in the larger metropolitan area.'
People build weekend homes.
And so we got engaged in many of these.'
These are drawings by someone called'
Sunand Prasad who used to be the president'
of the RIBA in London.
He did these as a student.
But it's a very interesting drawing,"
because this is a villa with a veranda, the colonial villa,'
which is what people replicate.
And this is the comparison where the villa'
is a free-standing object, whereas'
in a traditional Indian house, the center,'
the courtyard becomes where it's an inside-out Palladian"
villa, because the symmetry and the image of the object'
comes from within, rather than from out.'
And this is the kind of thing that'
gets built on the outskirts of Mumbai.'
And I always tell this joke.
You know, this was for a very well-known pop star.'
I happened to meet the contractor going'
in the boat across the bay.
And he said he was designing this house for this pop star.'
And I said, who is the architect?'
He said, I'm the architect.
So I said, are you going to design this?'
He said, no.
She gave me an image of the White House in Washington.'
I'm just copying it.
So this was the result.
And so, when you have these kinds of intervention that'
create another kind of polarity and you have "beware of dog"'
signs, you have lights and barbed wire,'
this is urban people, affluent urban people,'
creating a polarization using architecture then.'
So these are hard thresholds, because it'
doesn't allow for any porosity.
It is contained in itself.
So in our projects we've tried to address this."
This is an early house we did for a young filmmaker'
and his wife where the living room of the house'
is a big porch.
It is a gesture of offering to the village, which'
means that it's open.
They closed the house.
They secured the bedrooms when they go away.'
But this porch is open.
It has taps that are available.
The roof collects water, which is fed to the taps.'
So the villagers, the caretaker, they'
actually can use it as their space.'
So there's a kind of pulse that you dissolve the threshold that"
otherwise would exist by defining the house'
in the paradigm of the villa.
And so that sense of porosity.
But also, then, the material, the way it's"
articulated, its sort of these courtyards'
within, which become light boxes.'
Being a filmmaker, you are sensitive to that'
and wanted to be able to play with light and aperture.'
So light is something of concern to us.'
And that's what the porch looks like."
Those are the taps that people can drink out of, wash'
their feet, if they want.
And the door is closed, this light furniture is moved away,'
and they take it over.
So the caretaker uses it in the evening to sit with his family,'
because these people go there a few times in the year.'
And so it's therefore designed in this kind of light manner."
And of course, being a tropical climate, the blinds that you'
see in the exhibition, we use that a lot'
as a way of creating the flexibility for shade and also'
the louvers, because prediction from the rain and sun.'
The entrance is very low key.
You just slip between this wall and that stair, which'
takes you up to the terrace, and you come into the house.'
And the materials are very, very minimal and basic.'
So the maintenance is low, but it's also"
a refuge for people in the city, the onslaught'
of a city like Mumbai.
The visual onslaught creates a different.'
And then that's one of the light boxes"
that they can modulate with the shutters'
to create different sort of light qualities.'
And this was a house we did in 2000, so it's"
one of our older projects.
More recently, about three years ago,'
we did a house in that same area,'
where a doctor who sort of discovered drug-resistant TB'
wanted to build a big villa because now he'
had become famous.
He was coming to Harvard to lecture, and he said,'
I must have a villa so when people visit me,'
I can take them there for the weekend.'
And his aspirations were exactly like the White House'
aspiration.
And studying this, we realized the village'
is going to slowly encroach upon this land'
because it's a longer road.
And so there were two or three approaches we took.'
One is, how do you disaggregate it,'
so that when the village does grow around it,'
this merges with the landscape in terms of scale,'
rather than it being--
and the other was, we said, let's use it"
as an experiment ourselves to look at incrementalism'
and affordability, which means if a middle class person had'
to build a weekend home or a home run in this territory,'
they could build one unit and then they could add'
these things as they went on.
So we got a house which was three disparate parts, which'
was owned by program.
And just to sort of quickly explain it to you.'
So this is the living-dining.
And then this is a bar which has a lap pool and the doctor's"
study and a guest suite.
And then this is a bedroom zone which has three bedrooms.'
So when the family is there together,'
they can treat it as one big room.'
And they have guests, they put blinds down,'
and it becomes three rooms.
And this is it.
The idea of the pool being discreet'
was very important, because the villas I showed you,'
people build pools in their rolling lawns with sprinklers.'
And then you have the poor workers'
who are rural inhabitants of the area.'
So again, just through the way space is articulated,'
you actually highlight and exaggerate'
these spatial iniquities.
And so, how can one then use space'
as a way to address some of these questions?'
And that's what we tried to sort of do here."
So the pool is very discreet, but yet it's"
pleasurable visually.
And so you'll see it in the model,"
the doctor's study and the courtyard, the living suite."
And this is the bedroom suite.
And that's what it looks like on approach."
The village will sort of come up to this point,'
and it'll dissolve.
And you can see it with the rural area.'
The scale is very low key.
It has a base in stone, which is a local stone,'
and plaster surfaces and clay tile roof.'
So it's very simple materials.
The windows are exaggerated.
Most of the ventilation is through the courtyard,'
but the apertures that view out are these copper boxes.'
So that was the only bigger kind of investment.'
And as you go through the house, this is the living room.'
So that's the dining, that's the kitchen,"
and this is the living space.
And one courtyard is connected to the other'
through a series of layers.
So not only does it allow for a nice modulation of light,'
but the air to go through it.
And so, the bar with the pool is what I'm showing you next."
So it's discreet.
That's the study.
It frames the outside, but it keeps'
the privacy of the inside.
And it modulates the light, because in a harsh climate,'
actually, this is a very cooling kind of scenario.'
And it also tries to establish through its minimalism'
a kind of peace and tranquility, which again,'
coming from the city, one pines for.'
And then as you go through separate courtyards,'
this is the bedroom suite.
So here you have the blinds, which can all'
come down to create privacy.
Or it can have a great sense of openness'
when the kids are there and the family wants to deal with them.'
This opens out to another set of gardens.'
And this collects the water.
So it's also designed to be enjoyed in the monsoon, which"
is three or four months.
And so that's very exciting to deal"
with climate in these ways.
In terms of details, there's this thing"
with just a flashing and copper, which picks up the sun'
and glistens.
And these are the copper walls.
And then these are different colored windows,'
which actually are the only thing that establish time.'
There's no paintings in the house."
But through the day, as the sun moves,'
the roof sort of is awash with different colors.'
And there's a palette of oranges and reds and yellows."
And so each room in each space is coded differently.'
As we go to the next set, which is conservation--'
actually, this becomes critical conservation.'
This becomes complex.
Because your patrons are often a chief minister'
of the prime minister or an influential politician.'
The clients are NGOs that you're trying"
to put together as a constituency,'
and the users are citizens there.'
So this is where the books, the catalogs, the other instruments'
for modes of advocacy and creating these conversations'
become important.
And so, again, in the exhibition, this is elaborated.'
But we've been involved in getting conservation"
legislation through.
This was a document that led to the conservation.'
And this was a whole story in itself.'
And these were our concerns in a sense.'
And of course, they also resulted in an influence,'
because this was the first urban conservation'
legislation in India.
But how do you make this instrumental on the ground?'
And so, some of this was also self-initiated projects.'
So we found in one of the districts'
in this historic area the biggest'
chunk was the Prince of Wales museum, which was a big player.'
And we made a master plan for them,'
conservation master plan, and then identified'
small interventions that could be'
made that might change and expand'
the functionality, the presence, et cetera, of that museum--'
for the contemporary time, but also given'
the situation in the city.
And the first intervention was, we found a warehouse which'
was, there's no windows here except for that hoist-up"
material.
And in this little kind of setback,'
we created a contemporary veranda,'
which opened up circulation.
And you suddenly got 50,000 square feet of gallery space.'
So when they saw that happening, just because we had proposed'
it, it opened up a whole dimension'
in terms of how they could raise funds.'
And we made models, and that led to it actually happening.'
And so this is where you see it.
There was a shaft for light, which'
we converted into a circulation system,'
and added what you see in gray.
And we picked up on the vocabulary and rhythm,'
because this is a grade one building,'
but treated it like a contemporary intervention.'
And this was a stone that was excavated'
from the openings that were created to make'
the connections as a memory.
But this was done as a reversible gesture.'
So the idea is this whole thing can'
be dismantled without much destruction'
if another generation felt this wasn't"
the good attitude or the right attitude to approach it.'
So, the temporal dimension here, the sense of reversibility,'
is what makes it a critical intervention,'
because this is a response to a moment which'
might defer in terms of values society'
has, down a generation or two.
And then we added-- they needed a gateway because it'
was a real mess here.
So a museum shop, a little auditorium, security, tickets,'
all of that.
So we sort of made an entrance to the museum,'
which sort of becomes a gateway to the museum.'
And now we are doing a little children's pavilion here,"
which is under construction.
So this became the gateway.
It was in stainless steel in a grade one building.'
Again, the reversibility dimension.'
It's totally reversible, very easily."
And it becomes a gateway to the museum,'
which is where you pick up your bags on your way'
out, so it's very discreet.
And it's a contemporary kind of intervention there."
And this third example, which is the Chowmahalla'
Palace in Hyderabad, which is a large palace--'
the Charminar is there, for those of you'
who might know Hyderabad, and this is Nizam's family."
They were the richest people in the world until the 1920s.'
And he was also someone who didn't"
want his state of Hyderabad to go to the Indian Union.'
And the army had to go in to take it over'
to make it part of India when we had a partition-- so'
an interesting character.
And this had fallen into disrepair'
because he migrated to Australia.'
And this was a large chunk of property there.'
And what you see in red-- so, that's the palace."
But the palace used to extend this whole chunk,'
with the [non-english] the big mosque there,'
and they had direct access to the mosque.'
And everything in red was encroached illegally,'
but with concrete buildings.
So it wasn't like it was stuff that could be reversed."
And so the question here--
and it was a very complex project.'
It involved lawyers, the Nizam's wife, his first wife, Princess"
Ezra, who is Turkish, wanted to do something'
to give back to the city.
And we got involved.
It was a 12-year project.
But basically to position it as a public space'
for the density--
you can see the density here--
of Hyderabad.
And how to stabilize this encroachment--'
and so we focused on this series of courtyards'
where the definition was very clear and restored it.'
That's how we found it when we started the project."
It was a process of measure drawings.'
And there are about 200 of these, some of which'
are in the exhibition.
And an amazing experience, because we also'
forget what measure drawings are and how you touch and feel'
and realize the scale of a place.'
It gives you an amazing pulse on not only the material,'
but then as you start mapping in a forensic way, the defects,'
the problems, you begin to open up'
a world of materials, construction techniques,'
and attitudes which otherwise, in our daily practice,'
we forget.
And I think this is very important,'
because I think here--
we use the word critical conservation.'
And I think it's this critical dialogue that is created"
between the old and the new.
That's what is very important.
And you know, just building back things in line.'
A column like that takes three months.'
It's essentially a post and beam structure, which you see."
But everything that is decorated was just made up in lime.'
And each column takes three months.'
So how you sequence it-- it's a whole different approach"
to engaging.
The protocols are different.
The way you can read, the instructions is different,'
the camaraderie and the relationship'
you have to build with the craftspeople is different.'
And so it is a reality check, because it tells you'
about other forms of practice, let's say."
And so that's some of the restored areas."
And that's the central [inaudible],,"
which was the durbar.
And you know, that entire ceiling was remade.'
I mean, it had completely collapsed.'
We had samples.
We recast it from that.
And in India, these crafts exist.'
So that is a luxury.
And how you build those relationships is the challenge.'
And now it's a museum to the legacy of the Nizam,"
but very carefully done.
There's glass that separates those antique saris"
from the viewers.
But it's done in a way that it's barely noticeable."
The budgets were very low, so it is a gallery.'
It was very easily done.
There's no air conditioning.
But it's done for the public to enjoy this campus"
as a public space.
So in putting this together, I just'
happened to come across this in The New York Times on Sunday.'
And I've been watching here at the GSD through the summer"
the repair of Gund Hall.
And you know what Kevin Cahill and his gang'
have done is mind blowing.
They recast those concrete pillars patiently.'
But if you look at the corner in the char house,'
where the pillars meets the wall of Stubbins,'
the match is perfect.
It's 100%.
You can't even tell it was repaired."
It was painstaking.
It was three months.
It reminded me of the columns we had to do in the Chowmahalla'
Palace.
And the thing is that I think we, as architects, are'
interested in a kind of creative conservation, naturally.'
I think all our projects is about this critical dialogue'
between the old and new.
And our interests, as you can see,'
lies in the recycling of building spaces'"
revitalization.
And as designers, I think we're equipped"
to see the opportunities that exist'
in the reorganization of space, and therefore'
the new potentials for historic buildings.'
And as a practice, we've learned a great deal about design"
from conservation, which informs our work,'
I think, tremendously about weathering.'
Mohsen has written a whole book on it,'
but weathering-- that intersection is just'
mind blowing.
We believe that the design of a good modern building'
and the conservation or historic building'
are not different practices.
But I think within the framework of pedagogy,'
what I saw happening at the GSD makes'
me think that maintain-- this says innovation is overrated.'
We all live in that world of innovation.'
We get excited about the word innovation.'
But maintenance, restore, repair, et cetera,'
is as critical.
Because we are interested as architects in the subjective,'
which is the intangible.
But the hyper-tangible is as exciting.'
And I think dealing with both these ends of the spectrum,'
of the hyper-tangible and the intangible,'
is also the potential for creating'
an intersection between what we talk'
about as risk and resilience and critical conservation.'
Look at the amount of rebuilding that's going"
to happen in Houston in the next few days'
and many other parts of this country.'
But around the world with displacement, refugees.'
And so repair and restoration and maintenance,'
we have to also find within pedagogy'
and articulate a position, albeit theoretical,'
to take this more seriously and to create intersections'
between risk and resilience and critical conservation.'
So when I saw this on Sunday, something clicked in my head.'
And I said, I must sort of put this up there.'
We go to institutions, it becomes really interesting.'
Because here, the patron and clients sometimes collapse.'
But the users are often differentiated.'
And even the patrons and clients,'
I would argue, whether it's here at Harvard,"
you have committees of the president,'
and then you have clients who are maybe the faculty.'
And then you have users who are the students.'
And so these, again, they are different strategies.'
This was a very early project we did'
for the Tata Institute of Social Sciences'
in Tuljapur, which is a very remote campus.'
It gets two inches of rain, so there's no water."
And so we designed this building as a large ship.'
This was the master plan.
And the building I showed you was a part here.'
Sorry, this one.
We only did some samples, and then they'
got other architects to build, which'
was about collecting water.
And you can see a really harsh landscape.'
But it was also about disaggregating'
the water and passive cooling.
So we created these cooling towers'
where water for each zone or for each dormitory'
and their toilets were stored locally.'
So people would ration it.
So there would be a group of 20 people responsible for how'
the water was used.
And the water trickled on a wet mat here, and the air came in.'
So you could actually cool the rooms.'
So it was that wind scoop principle'
from [inaudible] and many other places.'
And we also tried to take what was in this very poor area--'
there are just courtyard houses--'
and the little decoration and a door which is painted'
is all they can afford.
So there's a kind of frugal aesthetic there."
So that became the kind of benchmark for our inspiration.'
And this is now talking about 22 years ago.'
So one has, of course, changed.
And then we experimented with material,'
because it had to be local.
It was about training people locally, so it was ferrocement.'
We actually set up machines on recycled cycle tired.'
And this is the ferrocement.
So it's a very minimal amount of cement, local stone."
But then it brings a certain discipline and rigor'
to the kind of buildings that are produced from it.'
And so this was the only way to build'
in a remote location like this.
And some of the housing, where the terrace was a pavilion,'
because that was the best place to sleep in the afternoon.'
So it was like this sort of ship in the desert.'
But I sort of learned from it, because in some ways,'
what I call the dimension of passive cooling'
failed completely.
And one realized that sustainability is really'
linked to lifestyle.
We talk about that, and you know, to make this work,'
it means the 20 students have to all go into their beds'
at 10 o'clock and stay still so the air is not disturbed."
And then it would work.
But if they're hanging around, drinking, smoking, partying,"
this is never going to work.
Then you have to put in the mechanical fixes of fans'
and all of that.
And so that link between lifestyle was very revealing.'
Our most recent project, which is not yet finished--'
I was talking to Mohsen just before the lecture about it--'
is a building in this, I would think, historic modern campus'
of CEPT University.
It was designed by Doshi starting in '65."
I studied here.
It's an absolutely amazing piece of modern architecture."
And over the years, the school has grown tremendously.'
And you had a campus that had become very messy,'
with all sorts of buildings and no coherence.'
And so we were given a site.
Christopher Benninger, also an alum of the GSD,'
American architect who lives in India, made the master plan.'
And he put this as the site of the library,'
really, to be on axis with Doshi's buildings,"
because that's the main entrance."
But also in a way to engage different parts'
of the campus, which had otherwise got'
disaggregated in some way.
So what we did was--
what we've done is this building."
We are now doing the cafeteria.
We added a little pavilion here--'
different things to bring coherence'
to this sort of central hub to regain this sort of identity.'
But a very difficult project, because here my patrons--'
actually, my clients and my users were architects.'
And so that was-- and most of the clients'
were architects who were five, 10 years senior to me'
in the School of Architecture, people you almost called "sir."'
So it was very hard to negotiate with this.'
And it also meant many, many presentations'
put up on YouTube.
You had alum calling from Toronto telling you'
what you should be doing.
So it was a very, very complicated thing.'
But the most complicated aspect was Christopher Benninger,'
the program that he put here, would require'
a six-story building, which was very complicated,'
especially in this campus.
And so we decided this was an intervention'
in a contemporary piece of heritage site'
or historic kind of thing.
So we basically established that we'
were going to pick up on all Doshi's buildings,"
not go a centimeter higher.
And so essentially, we had no choice but to go underground.'
And this was my first presentation,'
when I surprised them.
I had the model closed.
And they saw a two-story building'
or a three-story building.
And they said, you haven't read the brief."
This is impossible.
You can't do it.
It has to be six stories.
And then I pulled the model aside.'
And this was the moment where there was'
silence for about half an hour.
They were looking at each other, not knowing quite what to do.'
But we basically proposed a building'
to respect Doshi's buildings that would go subterranean."
But also, it made sense from a geothermal perspective'
and the temperatures go up to 50 degrees centigrade.'
It's a very hot dry.
The CEPT's stepped wells, some of you might know,"
have this precedence of how you can use this depth.'
So we go down actually 12 meters into the ground'
in the library, which is quite a lot.'
And so basically what is below ground is all in concrete.'
It's heavy.
It's three buildings within buildings,"
which is, you have a central core, which'
goes down four floors.
It's a library stack.
It's like a big walk-in closet for books."
And the logic of that is completely different.'
It's 8 feet heights, because you don't need more than that."
And there are 25 rooms that you can sit in.'
And then you have another skin, which'
is the spaces that sort of surround it.'
And then you have a kind of skin that covers that, encloses it.'
And then you have an outer skin, which'
is the facade above ground.
So it's a three-layered building, which then also"
is a response to the climate.
Because in the tropics, buildings are traditionally'
heterogeneous in their composition,'
consisting of many parts, responding'
to different aspects of the climate,'
keeping rain out, modulating the sun, et cetera.'
And so I think the modernists simplified this into,'
or believed that large areas of a single material'
tend to prolong the life of buildings.'
So besides changing the form and structure of architecture,'
in a sense, so here we tried to reclaim that, at least address'
that, and especially in a school of architecture,'
where we felt students could maybe learn from that.'
And so this is the model that's here"
in the exhibition with the upper facade.'
This is a concrete base.
And these are courtyards, so you actually get natural light'
all the way down there.
And then these are the stacks, which'
are just for more dead storage.
And so in another angle, you have carrels that sort of--'
these are courtyards.
They get very nice light.
And these are carrels that surround the courtyard,'
so it becomes a layer.
And then these become large spaces for reading.'
And this is the book stack that goes all the way down.'
It's just been occupied but not finished."
It will finish in two months.
So my images are limited, but I'll show you some."
So this just shows you the different sections'
and the skin, which is in gypsum board, that'
sort of creates a surface above ground for that sort of area.'
And so that's what the finished product looks like."
These are the louvers, which are operate-able.'
And these are thick walls that are splayed,'
where students can sit.
They sit and read here, but you also'
enter the building through these different bridges.'
This is when the louvers are opened.'
It gets completely transparent, and you can set it as you want.'
And they're going to actually use"
a class-- one semester is going to be a required class where'
students are going to use the building to map climate'
and to understand its functioning, light, temperature'
measurements, et cetera.
And so scale, as I said, was the most important sort of aspect.'
And so we took these datums and really worked with them'
very carefully.
And you create a kind of solid base which, I mean,'
we didn't want to just allude to this directly by using brick."
So we kind of reinterpreted it.
Now this also becomes--
the pattern here is meant for the convocation.'
So this becomes the backdrop now for convocation.'
And they set the louvers depending on the effect,'
and they'll soon start putting the year of the students"
that graduate, I suppose, on there.'
And then when you look through it,'
this is the courtyard, the first courtyard.'
Those are the carrels.
This is the bridge that connects you.'
So this is really outside, in a sense.'
And then you enter the building at that point.'
And the ground floor is just an ambiguous space,'
meant for juries and exhibitions,'
so it draws people in.
The reading rooms are above.
And the more quiet areas and the books are below.'
So it's air conditioned upstairs."
And it has carpet.
It has a very quiet environment, a lot of connectivity.'
So students can work there.
It will be open 24/7 as a hub.
And so these louvers are very easy to maintain and to move.'
There's a catwalk on the outside here."
And one handle allows you to operate the whole thing.'
So anyone can sort of really walk, then you lock it in.'
It's a very smooth, a very well designed or fabricated thing."
And so basically, you have a catwalk'
outside here, which also acts as a rain gutter.'
And on the inside, you see this brow,'
which is a catwalk to operate the louvers that'
are on the upper level.
And then as you go down, it's all in concrete."
It's all molded concrete.
The structure is very invisible.
There is a series of portals so you'
don't see beams and columns.
And all the services are stacked in the books, the air'
conditioning, the electrical, the Wi-Fi.'
So you don't see services at all on the wall."
So it's very sort of abstract and simple,"
which is the areas that you go down here and step.'
So the light comes down through those skylights,'
depending on how these louvers are modulated.'
So this is the first level there.'
These are the carrels yet under construction.'
And then you enter the book stacks, because they'
have their own logic.
So you go down half a floor, up a floor,'
and there is a series of mezzanines.'
And sectionally, you always look at two levels.'
So this is the courtyard, these are the carrels,'
you're looking at it from a book stack."
And here you go up these-- and you can go down.'
And the rooms are down there, and then there's"
another level that's lower.
And then you always look at-- this'
is minus 4 meters, that's minus 8 meters."
You're always connected visually, sectionally,"
to at least two levels.
And here, the tables are going in.'
The lights are built into the tables.'
But that's natural light down at eight meters"
within the building.
And so this is that lowest level.'
These portals define the structure.'
And this is where the big tables have come now.'
And so it's very minimal.
It's very quiet.
We were very interested in the idea of silence'
and letting people imagine things here,'
so the detail is completely stripped, to create as much'
of a silent space as possible.
And in contrast, the logic of the book core'
creates an intimacy with the books,'
because it's only eight feet, there"
are smaller rooms within the stack.'
It's like a walk-in wardrobe of books."
And it has that kind of intimacy,'
as you have with your wardrobes for clothes.'
And the light, like I said-- so here you can see we'
are modulating the louvers.
This is on a time lapse.
The light can, depending on how you modulate it,'
you can actually just use natural light'
to pretty much, at least on these tables, have enough light'
that you can kind of read.
And then, of course, there's going"
to be artificial light here too, because you'd"
need that at some point.
And so this is the quietness of the space.'
These are the portals that define the structure.'
In the corner, there are rooms with their own skylights'
for quieter reading.
And the stacks are always adjacent,'
that you can move in through them.'
And these are the tables that are going in, in that sort of--'
And the upper area is much lighter.'
There are terraces, there are verandas,'
there are outdoor spaces, indoor, semi-open--'
so you have a whole range of places that you can sit in.'
And you know, of course, the light will get modulated.'
They have to set up a protocol for that.'
We are helping them develop a manual in order'
to actually do that.
So then we go to corporations, where it's like the houses."
While it's collapsed into one entity,"
often it is differentiated because the patrons are'
sometimes the chairmen of the corporation who has one dream,'
and then the clients are the real users'
who make the committees.
But it's less.
But again, unpacking it helps a little bit here.'
This is a very early project, one of our first ones in 2003,'
where India was just liberalizing its economy.'
And so the idea was, they wanted to build a glass star, which is'
the brief that we were given.
And of course, we convinced them to do that.'
So it was a long, big footprint, with courtyards,'
like apertures that modulate light.'
And we used very local materials of clay tiles.'
The roof held it.
And there was a modulation within it,'
as you walk through these different courtyards.'
And from the street, it had a less looming presence.'
The courtyards were very transparent.'
This is the arrival.
And it's telescopic because the courtyards visually stack up."
So it's also very cool.
This is in the rain shadow area, so it's in Coimbatore."
It's about a seven degree centigrade difference"
between the outside and this, because the water'
is used in this dry climate to actually cool the building.'
And it's open, single-loaded corner doors for circulation."
So actually, the circulation system'
becomes the social space, where we'
had artists do installations, where people could sit,'
et cetera.
And as you go into the building, it gets more intimate.'
So where the owners sit, it's almost the scale of a house."
And these are different artists.
Rajiv Sethi was our curator.
Manjit Bawa was a very well-known artist,'
translated his forms into a whole narrative'
through the building, for the railings of the building,'
for example.
And we were very much interested in recycling materials there.'
So all the little edges from the granite'
that got cut in shaping the granite'
were used to construct the waterfall.'
And so we tried to-- we were very,'
in this early stage of the practice.'
But also, as a resistance to what was being asked in India,'
then everyone wanted a glass box,'
because we had liberalized economy'
and you could import glass and alucobond and all of that--'
so for us to do also a moment of trying'
to go the other direction.
And one of the most interesting things with the artists'
was, it's a machine tool company."
So we went into their fabrication yard.'
It's a company called Lakshmi Machine Works, LMW."
And we picked up all the scraps from the pressing'
of the machine tool.
And then with Yogesh Rawal, who is an artist in Mumbai,'
we created these screens.
Because a building is ventilated naturally,'
because it's a series of courtyards with water."
And so this is all just scrap metal.'
So the people who work in the building, this'
is what gives them the wealth, and they touch the material.'
But it also creates a form of decoration'
and picks up on the original jali.'
And, I mean, I'm always complimented that, my god,"
it's nice you are promoting tribal art in India."
And I say--
I don't have the heart to say it's scrap metal."
And so, looking at these sort of corporate buildings,'
I think the challenge here is that corporate buildings are'
being linked to the curtain glass style of building,'
with air conditioning becoming a symbol of corporate power'
and aspiration.
And so, I think, in these buildings,'
what we've tried to do is sort of move away from that."
And this is a second building in Hyderabad, in Cberabad.'
That's Mario Botta's building.
Many architects have built here.
That was our site.
It's a company called KMC.
They do high infrastructure highways.'
And they have a control room like NASA,'
where they monitor all their trucks and workers'
and all of that.
And so their aspiration was to do one of these glass boxes'
in a high-tech building.
And I began to look at this, and this is Hyderabad.'
They would have riots there very often, because they'
were trying to split the state.
And so this in Mercedes Benz.
This is their showroom.
And so, when curtain glassing vendors'
sell you the curtain glass or alucobond,'
they sell you fishing nets with it,'
so that people can't destroy your building."
And you get a choice of blue fishing nets and white fishing'
nets.
So the image of the corporate box'
is so strong that people do this kind of thing.'
So this is crazy.
But it was inspirational in some way.'
And this was really what finally inspired us,'
this little water cooler in Jaipur,'
which we were mapping, because we'
were doing another project which I'll show you."
That guy works for the Business Association and Government.'
And when he puts his kettle out-- this'
is summer, 50 degrees, he's ready for business-- it's free."
People come, they put their hand out there,'
there are no plastic cups, they take the water, they drink it,'
they make a gesture of gratitude, and they go away.'
So it's totally sustainable.
It's a thatch hut with a beautiful brass lota."
And once in a while, he comes in.'
He keeps the hut damp, so that through evaporative cooling,'
the temperature of the hut is bearable for him.'
And the water within the hut is kept in earthen box.'
And that also has a porosity.
So with the evaporative cooling, the water really stays cool'
in what we call [non-english].
And anybody from India will know traditionally,'
everyone drank water like that.
And it's a beautiful gesture.
And this is what's very inspirational for us."
And so we aspired, then, to see how we could translate this'
into a building and use the principles in a sense,'
in this case, of, again, passive cooling, using material'
like this.
And the light is very beautiful in the way it filters through,'
and all of that.
And so we came up with a building for them,'
which is a five-story garden.
But it's not a vertical garden where"
you stick green on the wall.
But it's a performative screen that has a misting system that"
keeps the screen cool.
It allows the air to go through and humidify.'
These windows are all openable.
We couldn't get our LEED certification,"
because we weren't sealing these windows."
So this is when one began to be bothered'
by this chemical, mechanical fix kind of approach to it.'
Because now, of course, this has been corrected for India'
through another standard.
And these are hydroponic trays.
So the plants require very little water,'
because this is the drip irrigation method'
beat and things like that.
But the water is just used to cool'
the building in a spray form.
And then every facade can be different,'
depending on the direction it faces,'
the species it can support.
And we, of course, tested all this out and came up with this.'
And, you know, also impatient capital.'
They wanted the building ready in 14 months.'
And they finally agreed they'd give us"
two years to grow the facade.
So we literally built the facade and handcrafted it'
in a small shed, using one of our previous contractors.'
They had the cows come in before the building was'
done to make the building sacred and all of that,'
while we were yet making the facade, which got done later.'
And here, I think, also, what is happening in many parts, when'
you look at Africa, we look at India,'
we tend to fetishize traditional craft, because that is obvious.'
And I think that's important.
But I think it's also up to us how we extend this."
So these are recycled alloys of aluminum,'
which we got very cheap, which were melted down.'
This was a mold.
We could only afford one mold.
So a sprinkler system was built into the mold.'
And there are very small panels, which'
were handcrafted with a nice texture,'
because it was impure alloys.
And that's where it was being recycled."
But you got a lovely texture, which for us architecture'
is very good.
It was a large anodizing tank.
And then they just, in their yard, they stored these panels.'
And when enough panels were ready to put'
into a small little truck, which was economical,'
they took it to site, two people assembled it,'
and that's when the building was finished."
You had the misting system in play.'
And you can modulate the amount of water,'
depending on the temperature, for atmosphere.'
You can make it run.
You can simulate the monsoon.
But that's wasteful.
But this is really to cool.
to cool, so you can really get it down to mist.'
It all depends on the nozzles and the sort of control.'
And it also is interesting because the water'
gets, of course, recycled on this large podium, which'
is a garden.
You have the flowers bloom.
But the presence of the gardeners is very interesting.'
It's what Marty Chen said about the less powerful"
and the powerful coexisting.
And you can avoid the garden.
The facade and the identity of the building'
depends on the gardeners, and they're"
the lowest paid in that sort of corporation.'
And, of course, it is an ornament that comes out'
of the shadows, et cetera.
And the outside looks like that, so it's also"
nice to shield that way.
So it's basically-- and that's when it was first down,"
becomes a woolly monster.
You have to give it a haircut once in a while.'
It cuts back.
People pluck flowers.
So it's a very simple idea.
But sectionally too-- and it's a podium with the parking below."
And that's what it sort of looks like."
But also sectionally, it has a series of courtyards'
that extract the hot air.
So it also has a spatial logic, which'
is about circulation zoning of the different parts'
of the company, but also the climatic dimension.'
And, of course, it becomes a really performative'
vertical garden, with different departments'
and different spatial experiences.'
That building got a LEED certificate.'
That's across the road from us.
So it made me think of the walkie-talkie in London.'
And so the evaluation of the public dimension'
and implication of a building, again,'
is not measured enough, which is probably as important.'
And so we did this intuitively.
We didn't start off by saying, we"
are doing a building for sustainable design.'
Now our friends have forced us to measure temperatures,'
so we are creating a database to see what this actually means.'
But that's what images look like."
And this image I come back to.
I mean, this woman is wearing her sari.'
This is an image that an intern from Panama'
who was working with us went to site and took,'
so it's not even a staged picture."
But the fact that she has access to any part of the building,'
the identity of the building depends on her,'
this is an empowerment of probably the lowest-paid people'
in that corporation.
And the fact that she is in the presence of her bosses,'
that they can make eye contact, i think, creates and sets up,'
makes it a social condenser of another kind.'
And so, there are blinds there that this guy could decide'
to put the blind down, but no one'
does that because there's an awkwardness that comes from it."
And this is a form of transgression'
which you can do through spatial arrangements.'
And so they are really the heroes of the building,'
because these are green jobs.
And, you know, the building and the identity of the building'
depends on them, and that's how it sits there."
So we took this principle, turned it inside'
out a little bit, for a project, our first project in Europe'
for the Novartis campus in Basel.'
That's the river Rhine.
And we were very lucky to be called'
to design there, but also given a site right on the river.'
And this is a site plan by Vittorio Lampugnani,'
a very, very formalist sort of site plan.'
They gave us that site.
Some of these are done.
Some are not done.
And then they got left with two triangles,'
so they gave one to Frank Gehry and one'
to [inaudible],, because they felt those could deal with it.'
And with everybody else, Professor [inaudible]..'
I think that's his building.
And so that's what the campus looks like."
That's our building.
It's the first one on the River Herzog,"
and [inaudible] got built simultaneously.'
And now this has become a very beautiful park.'
This is a very old image.
And then these are some of the buildings.'
So, these will all come down, and they'll all"
become the same height.
And so this was the conceptual first model, where'
we said, instead of making a monolithic lab, how'
do you slice this down into different zones, a veranda,'
a big lab, people can contemplate,'
courtyards, et cetera?
Now, these were two small moves we made.'
And perhaps it comes from working in India'
and working in Mumbai.
This is the footprint.
Every building has the same footprint.'
And this is the given--
you have two, large, aggregated cores.'
And everyone on that campus has followed that.'
And we found that really not effective,'
because it separates people, it separates the scientists'
from the administrators, but also it'
creates consolidated circulation, which'
means the accident or accidental meeting, like the wonderful,'
you know, GDS circulation, that you meet people,'
you choose which path to take, didn't happen."
And we felt, if you had to make this building'
a social condenser in that way, the circulation'
and how you fragmented it was critical.'
And in Switzerland, with the code, with 30 consultants,'
just to get that shift, and us being the first outliers'
from India who had never built in Europe,'
was a whole drama in itself.
And I can give you a lecture on that process.'
And for me, the highlight of it was'
when I used to get really upset trying to convince them.'
There was one of our German consultants who looked at me.'
He was an elderly man.
And he was very, very mature.
And he said to me, he said, Mr. Mehrota, you get upset a lot.'
You mustn't get upset.
You must understand.
In Switzerland, we make problems because we have no problems.'
And so that was like a flash.
And you know, we got very enthusiastic about this.'
But anyway, they agreed to this disaggregation, which'
is amazing because it allowed us not only a massive footprint,'
which was uninterrupted, but it also'
allowed us various circulation modes, and therefore giving'
people alternative routes.
The second one, again, comes from very much'
a "working in Mumbai" kind of attitude,'
was that they said, OK, it's 4.5 meters."
That's a floor height, and you have to do that."
And then we challenged that.
And we said, look for officers.
You don't need more than eight feet,"
so why are we doing 4.5 meters?
And I don't know.
for some reason, they agreed to that too.'
That allowed us to stack many more offices there and call out'
a large courtyard in the middle, because we'
managed to fit the program.
So those two moves, which we were'
scared to do because no one had done,'
i think when you come from a place'
where you're continuously maneuvering"
these kinds of bylaws to find solutions,'
it becomes your first.
You get suspicious and you say, this can't be right."
We've got to tweak it, you know?
So it becomes a natural impulse.
So we came up with a section like that'
which is an entrance which comes to a viewing'
gallery, a courtyard.
But you see these heights are differentiated.'
So the circulation wraps around this courtyard.'
And you have many half flights, which'
means people can very easily climb,'
but they have also become incredibly social spaces.'
And Gunter Vogt from Zurich worked'
with us, the landscape architect,'
to develop this sort of courtyard.'
And a facade, which has 28 species.'
So it also maps the climate, because with subtle changes,'
different things bloom.
So it was a very important contribution that he made,'
and [inaudible].
And the other side of the Rhine.
So on one side, you have this green facade'
where the scientists can come out from their labs.'
And they look at green because they have been'
looking at periscopes all day--
or microscopes.
And here on the Rhine side, you have these large verandas'
where you view the river.
And these have blind's.
I'm sorry my image doesn't show it."
But usually the facade is very dynamic,'
because they are automated blinds.'
So they go up and down, depending on the sun.'
And we used concrete, which we mixed the [inaudible] stone,'
which is a natural, very beautiful'
yellow stone into the concrete, and got'
kind of the color of exactly the [inaudible]'
stone, which sort of matched it.
And as you go into the building, through the stair,'
the circulation wraps around this,'
you come to terraces at different levels.'
And the lab and the offices always'
blur, because it's visually very easy."
But because the circulation is punctuated by meeting rooms,'
you begin to meet people.
And you enter it, and these are labs,'
and you get glimpses of the labs.'
A lot of them are automated.
We've used just three materials, a kind of black graphite,"
a Stucco Lustro finish on all the surfaces,'
and a smoked eucalyptus on the cores.'
So the cores for circulation are defined by the eucalyptus,'
which you see here again.
And these are glimpses of the thing.'
And we worked with [inaudible],, who is a Swiss artist.'
And she's done a series of these video installations, which"
you walk through.
So you kind of-- her idea was that you would be'
bathed in warmth of the color.
But she took what the scientists were'
looking at through their microscopes'
and actually abstracted that.
So there are kind of familiar patterns,'
but they are artistic.
And you always walk through it, and you get these colors.'
And you negotiate the artwork on the floor,'
on the walls, as you walk through.'
And then you come up.
It's a very simple plan, but it gives you"
a rich space, because the offices completely'
open out into the courtyard.
These are the meeting decks at different levels.'
And you see a little stair.
You go up half a level, you come to another office,'
another half level.
It's a meeting area which is adjacent to the lab."
So the scientists see the administrators and vice versa.'
These are the decks to look at the river.'
These are the labs.
This is designed by Toshiko Mori.'
She did the furniture for Novartis Worldwide.'
And we were, I think, the first to use it.'
So she probably evolved it after this.'
But this was a prototype that she sort of developed.'
And so this is part of the circulation.'
The elevators are behind you.
And the circulation cuts through the garden, the labs.'
It's all very accessible.
And therefore there's a level of porosity,"
as you see in these sort of half stairs.'
And you can hide away in the garden.'
And now, of course, it's grown much more"
than when we took these images two years ago.'
And people can just sort of disappear.'
And it's quite thick.
And again, you see the decks for meetings.'
And here, you see the Stucco Lustro,'
but you actually circulate past the offices up half levels.'
You see the courtyard.
So that gave us the possibility to create this kind'
of spatial experience.
I just come to this last part, which'
is the hardest, which is the social projects, where'
patron clients and users, probably the only ones that'
are accessible are the users.
And the users are often people you'
can't get a pulse on because you have no access to them."
So they are slum dwellers or the absolute poor.'
The clients become NGOs and other mediating agencies'
that you work with.
And the clients are often governments.'
And so, here this becomes a wicked problem.'
And I was reading recently a piece'
by Pratap Bhanu Mehta, who is an Indian commentator, economist,'
I think.
And just to quote from him, he said,'
"In a society driven by deep inequality,'
there's not even a minimal basis for mutual concern."
Where social distance makes human beings'
almost a different species in each other's eyes,"
why would you expect anything else?'
Why would a contractor care if one of his construction workers'
used his hands rather than a brush'
to apply a dangerous chemical?
The more inequality there is, the harder'
it is to imagine what it's like to be in someone else's shoes."
It is hard to be admitted that even'
the most well-meaning and sensitive'
find it hard to imagine what the suffocation, darkness,'
and sheer physical suffering of being'
at the bottom of a social hierarchy might really be like.'
The very thing you would expect to instigate'
questions of justice makes it hard to even raise them."'
And so it really is a very difficult problem'
to be engaged with.
And I'm running out of time, so I'm"
going to go through these very quickly.'
This is just a map that shows inequality below the poverty'
line in India.
And you realize except for some pockets in Kerala, up there,'
it's, like, dismal.
And here, like I said, you have to differentiate it.'
It's a project we did for Magic Bus, which"
is an NGO that works with slums, where'
we use this experiment to actually build a campus just'
using materials that exist in slums'
as a way of creating a familiarity,'
but also inspiring these kids who would go to this campus'
to maybe repair their own houses.'
I'll just go through this quickly."
Some of you might have seen this.'
But we kind of use the logic of slums, the same materials,'
solid base, lighter structure on top-- the same materials'
but reconfigured differently.
Dining rooms.
And then imagining them as prototypes, which means that,'
could this dormitory and toilet become a community center'
in a slum with a public toilet?
And so we began to use it as a research project to do that.'
And at that time, we began to get interested'
in this question of sanitation.
And again, this is an image I always talk about'
that I took by accident.
And when I went back and I was downloading my images'
and I saw this, I was really moved.'
What moved me was to think that this kid was so intact--'
white socks, shoes, smile on his face-- come out of that slum.'
He's probably defecated in the open."
He's not had access to a toilet.
And that makes you even-- that's why"
I use that quotation, "Do you even'
understand these problems?"
So I mean, what is the moral value of acting?'
But what is the moral value of not acting in a case like this?'
This becomes an amazing dilemma.
So this is an extreme condition where'
our concerns are totally legitimate'
but our influence often can become'
very hard to kind of negotiate.
And so open defecation is a huge, huge problem in India.'
In fact, we started doing research with Spark for this.'
And you realize that India has the highest open defecation'
in the world.
I mean, Africa, where you would think'
because of poor infrastructure, is nowhere compared to India.'
And also because of India's density."
Just Mumbai, it's one toilet for 1,440 people."
Our aspiration is one toilet for 50 people.'
That's a Bombay Municipal Corporation,"
which means six families will use one toilet, which'
means you have a lottery, and you're"
lucky if you can use a toilet every six weeks or something.'
Because it's impossible that 50 people could use it"
or whatever.
So it's completely ridiculous.
Our prime minister has an amazing sort of aspiration.'
He wants a toilet in every household by 2019.'
And, I mean, it's amazing that he's even"
taking on this challenge.
But you see the defecation.
I mean, that's the highest defecation,"
open defecation in the world.
The problem is that, can you get a toilet in there for every one'
by '20?
Impossible.
And the reason is that we are thinking in absolute terms.'
And this is the way one can actually'
make it a design problem, because we'
are thinking of the absolute rather than the transitional.'
What we should be thinking about is'
how do we make the transition.
In the same way as India is trying'
to make its transition to renewables from fossil fuels'
through nuclear--
now, whether that's a good idea or not,"
but it is a transition-- you imagine transfer.'
The design of transitions becomes important.'
And so what the government is doing'
is building prefabricated toilets in factories'
and taking lorries and dumping them outside people's homes."
And research has shown that actually these toilets are'
being used to store grain, jewelry,'
because it's the most solid structure"
in the whole compound, because it's in concrete"
and you can lock it.
So it's a complete reversal of what the aspiration is."
So, of course, to make the transition'
before the transformation, or to think in terms of transition'
as designers rather than in absolute terms,'
which is often how we solve these problems-- whether it's"
going to be the responses in Houston--'
these are going to be all absolute solutions.'
The transitional question is important.'
And I think we don't have enough of a vocabulary for that."
So, of course, community toilets become the important thing.'
And so we came up with a prototype'
where we put the men and the women above, with the children.'
And we created a community center.'
We made the mistake of putting the caretaker there,'
and we got solar panels and got it off the grid.'
And why I say mistake, because that was a political mistake.'
And this is where the distinct engagement'
of the client-patron users is important.'
Because here, we were working with a mediator,'
which was the NGO.
We had no pulse of the user.
And politically, we didn't know what would go wrong."
And here, this-- the caretaker is usually the lowest caste.'
And this politically didn't work within that slum community,"
where we didn't have a first hand."
We were thinking of designers detached from it.'
And that's how one actually configures"
the patron, the client, and sees each of those constituencies'
respond is a real challenge.
And we tried building many of them.'
And the government stopped them.
People stopped them.
We built one in a remote location.'
And it worked really well as a community center.'
It lasted for about six months.
I went back.
That's public housing, which hasn't been occupied"
for 20 years, which is more reason'
why we should be building community toilets.'
Because no one is going to go in there.'
And that's, of course, a different discussion."
And when I went back six months later, it was a disaster.'
Because they had abandoned it.
The politicians had made it into a club.'
That's a television.
They watch cricket matches.
There are rum bottles there.
And of course, then Beckett comes to mind.'
Ever tried, ever failed.
No matter.
Try, fail again.
Fail better.
And so failure, I think, is also a subject'
that we should be discussing.
We entered a competition.
We won the first prize--
Gates Foundation-- where we made it even more'
embedded in the community, where it actually dissolves,'
more reversible in terms of the materials-- again,'
designing for these transitions as community spaces, also'
provocatively placed it across the temple.'
And of course, this also didn't get built."
It felt like we were trampled by elephants.'
And this is just the last project.'
And I'll finish in five minutes.
So this is, again, a similarly complicated project,'
where this is our client--
the mahout.
They're all Muslim in a state of Rajasthan, which"
is very Hindu, right wing.
And they look after these elephants.'
They earn about 5,000 rupees a month, which is $100.'
They are the lowest sort of paid community in a sense.'
And they have sort of-- elephants are--'
that's a mistake elephants are there, because this is a desert"
climate of Rajasthan.
They are used by the maharajas for ceremony and then tourism.'
This is from the New York Times Magazine from, I think,'
the '50s or the '60s.
It became something that the tourists use.'
And they get painted, which is terrible for their skin'
because it discolors their skin.
And this is how they were living, in stables'
with the mahouts living on top.
And that doesn't work.
Because the mahout and the elephant'
have a very close relationship.
Because he is the only one who can control them.'
They have an emotional relationship.'
And so they started living down there.'
That's when the government did a competition."
We won the first prize.
This was the site that was given to us, which had been quarried'
by sand contractors.
So it was a really terrible site to build in.'
And in research, we realized that this'
wasn't an architectural problem, that unless we"
solved the problem of water, this project'
wasn't worth even doing.
It was a landscape planning project.'
It wasn't an architecture project."
Not that we didn't pay attention to architecture,"
but it wasn't an architecture project."
And so we treated it as a landscape project,'
creating micro dams, using the levels,'
trying to plan to store water, to make a kind of sense'
of a moist environment where we could plant trees,'
looking at local species.
That's the site as we got it.
And we notice from Google the water drain channels,'
which we used to our advantage.
And that was the master plan that was built.'
And there's many components-- the housing in all the land"
that's not used for water, a little--"
a school, where there were some broken down buildings'
which we repaired, a visitor's center"
which hasn't yet happened.
And this is 2007.
So in 2007, when we got the site,'
that's what it looked like.
In three years, that's what we transformed it to"
by just creating the micro dams.
So the same hill is that.
And 2017, that hill is the same hill.'
The whole environment is completely transformed.'
And in these 11 years, the project'
has stopped and started and stopped and started.'
And I'll just tell you that story has I end."
But of course, we designed the housing.'
The row housing is what the government specified.'
We broke it into clusters.
So a 400 square foot house actually becomes much larger.'
It doubles in size just because you'
add a courtyard and then a shared courtyard'
and a pavilion on top.
So these are subversions that you can do spatially.'
If you take a brief from the government,'
you will really just land up doing that.'
So that becomes a way you can actually tweak it to expand it.'
And then if these three people get along well,'
they actually are living in a mansion.'
So those are drawings.
We, of course, took the architecture seriously.'
This was used to store the food.
And that gave you insulation.
And they also come in small, medium, large and extra large.'
So we had to test them for sizes.'
Elephants can't sleep on flat ground."
They have to sleep on a berm.
Otherwise, they can't get up.
So we had to profile the land--
or the room-- for the size of the elephant, so to speak.'
And that's what it sort of looked like."
That's where they walk to work.
And this is now, it's occupied.
But it's not been painted.
But this is how we sort of imagined it.'
These are different-- different people'
have done different things.
Some people have lawns because they have water.'
Some people grow flowers to sell them'
because they have more water.
This is a reversal of an inequity.'
Because the rich and the middle class who live in'
Jaipur have to get tankers of water.'
Whereas here, the poorest community have more water'
than they, so to speak, need.
So it's a subtle correction.
Not that we started out by saying we want to do that,'
that's the end.
I mean, we started out by just saying,'
let's make an armature in which life can flourish."
And architecture was in service of that.'
And these are some towns that haven't been occupied yet."
But you can see how the trees have grown.'
And now they will be allocated as the new.'
And life corrodes housing.
And so people have occupied it.
Goats have arrived-- trees, dish antennas.'
And now the new stage of the project'
has started six months ago with the new chief minister.'
And now we're going to have artists actually paint this"
and decorate it.
And there's going to be a whole transformation."
And so we are now going back and looking at the infrastructure'
there to enhance the water.
This is what the elephants do.
They take tourists up the ramparts of the [inaudible]..'
They go rogue.
I mean, there have been tourists who'
have been killed because these elephants,'
because of the heat and the lack of water.'
Their skin discolors, as you saw in that image,'
because they don't have water to wash it."
They walk to work on these hot tarmac roads.'
And so the environment for them was horrible.'
But now they can have a snack on their way to work.'
They have all the water.
These are images from just when we had done this in 2008.'
And now, of course, these trees have all grown.'
But the main--
I mean, here's an elephant coming home"
after the day's work.
But the main thing is the water.
Because the water, besides the health of the elephant,'
is very critical to the bonding between the elephant'
and the mahout.
Because the process of bathing the elephant'
is when they are most comfortable.'
And they have great gratitude for that.'
And the mahout controls them by bathing them.'
And they remember that.
And so this has changed that relationship, which they never'
had.
They had other ways of sort of working'
with their own elephants.
And that's a salute.
And now, of course, trees have grown.'
It's transformed.
Some of the lowest parts of the site,'
because of water accumulation, are like forests.'
Elephants can't hang around alone."
They're very social.
So we had to build these towns where'
they, for a couple of hours in the day, they come'
and chat with friends and all that.'
But as time went by, the teenagers there'
saw this as an opportunity.
And they started a company called Elefantastic.'
And it's on TripAdvisor.
You can book a meeting with the elephants.'
You feed them.
You give them 100 rupees.
You want to have a bath with them, you pay 500 rupees'
and you can have a bath.
So there's a whole economy that has"
evolved by these young kids who are the sons of the mahouts.'
And this is the story which, for the exhibition'
I did 2007 to '17.
And you see the red shows our engagement.'
We are fighting, writing letters,'
meeting government officials, lobbying.'
We seem to be the only ones interested in it.'
Then we sort of give up.
And then I write about 10 letters'
to the BJP government, which comes into power.'
Because they're the ones who started it."
This is the congress and their allies.'
And I write many letters to the chief minister.'
And then one day, I get a phone call from her,'
like a few months ago.
And she says, I have all your letters.'
They're on her desk.
And the files are all there.
Come and see me tomorrow.
And then I go and meet her.
Vasundhara Raje is her name.
And I meet her in January.
And she says, the timing was wrong.'
I'm sorry that I didn't respond to you."
But now we're ready to go.
And so as we speak, there are 100 workers on site,'
finishing it.
The artists are going to come in.'
They're building all the infrastructure."
And I'm hoping by January, before the elections are"
announced, she'll get it done.
And that's one reason she wants to do it."
But what is interesting is also the agencies.'
Everything changes in these years.'
And the architect seems to be the only one who'
is interested in the project.
And so now when you come to this point,'
we started with some sets of agencies.'
Now the forest department, the zoo authority,'
we're dealing with completely different people."
And it's a very complicated project."
But I think in understanding-- and we did this a lot,'
articulating what are these constituent groups?'
Who are our clients here--
the PWD, the forest department.
Who's the patron?
Writing to the chief minister in a parallel way,'
aligning these things, working with the mahouts'
for their requirements, is what carried the project'
for the 11 years.
If we hadn't engaged with those constituent groups,"
I don't think we could have managed to do it."
Because we always had the support of the mahouts'
and things.
So it's an interesting story.
And I hope I can tell it one day.'
We have now repaired some broken houses.'
There are kids there.
So an American NGO has started a school.'
And life goes on.
So I think for me, working-- just to summarize--'
is working in Mumbai, in India, is about'
negotiating these global flows that do not erase and remake'
landscapes, but rather to occupy these local fissures to create'
fascinating hybrids that I believe.'
And I think softening these thresholds'
between constituent groups and your approach'
to the models of practice is, I think, an interesting way'
to engage with this.
The question for architects and conservationists,'
urban designers, landscape architects, planners,'
is can we design for this space of blur?'
Can we design with a divided mind?'
Can be, more importantly, be inspired'
by the design intelligence of this kind'
of particular condition to act and intervene as designers,'
activists in our own locality?
Can we design to construct soft thresholds that'
facilitate porosity socially and spatially?'
So our approach has, in this context of our democracy,'
been to do just that.
I believe this is a practice of democracy.'
And it doesn't give you necessarily the most consistent"
visual images, which I think Mohsen picked up'
on very insightfully.
But it allows you to engage in these multiple kinds of ways.'
Because a pluralistic society is one'
that not only accepts differences but goes'
beyond to understand and is influenced by it'
in productive ways.
That is to see the simultaneous validity of difference.'
Because once the architect and planner sees'
these various differences as being valid,'
the challenge is how to go beyond their polarized binaries'
through the making of architecture,'
soft thresholds, spaces that are visually, physically porous,'
plural in spirit and expression, and most important'
and critically encompassing of the context.'
This is truly, I think, the aspiration of our practice.'
We are aware that many of the conditions that I've described"
are emblematic of the issues and the crises,'
really, that we are facing in many parts of the globe, crises'
within the profession, but also crises'
in the contemporary world that we collectively occupy.'
And I think understanding this crisis and the condition'
of crisis and articulating it in terms that are useful for us'
to designers is an absolute crucial first step.'
Because after all, as Paul Romer from the World Bank said,'
he said, a crisis is a terrible thing to waste.'
Thank you very much.
[applause]
So Rahul, as you can tell from the response of the audience,'
this was really wonderful.
It was great.
Rahul is probably the only person,'
or one of the very few people that I know,'
who can deliver two lectures within almost the space of one'
lecture and get away with it.
He always says this after my lectures.'
No, that's not true-- the first time that I'm saying it."
But I feel that there is a third part to this talk.'
And I really, really hope that we'll"
have the chance to talk together,'
to talk with some of our colleagues, about the--'
I think the next phase.
One thing that I was remiss to mention'
is that there is a reception after this.'
So there is actually some food and wine'
waiting for all of you.
And I don't want to keep you.
So I would like to invite Rahul to a conversation that'
will really pick up on some of the consequences'
and implications.
And maybe there could be one or two'
questions from the audience.
One thing that I feel would be wonderful,'
if you can reflect on, it's the issue of the soft threshold"
that you touch on in the exhibition is very clear.'
It's very clear in terms of the continuity of the projects."
It's very clear in the exhibition"
when you start from the left to the right.'
But you didn't, in a way, do the talk"
in a chronological fashion.
But there is, in a way, a kind of chronological history'
to these projects.
So my question is really about the juxtaposition'
of the ideas now in relation to the chronological history'
of the projects.
By that, I mean there are certain things that you could'
do five, six, seven years ago.
And my guess is that some of those things'
might be becoming harder for you to do today,'
simply because the scale of operations of your office'
is changing.
So this question of the soft threshold'
relates to the combination of desires'
to certain kinds of expertise.
And so I'm wondering whether you feel you've had to"
or you will need to change the organization of your office'
to stay, in some ways, true to sustaining this concept'
of the soft threshold.
And I suppose the thing that we will'
discuss at a later point is like,'
what are the consequences of this kind of practice'
in a way for pedagogy, for what we do for the education?'
And this is something that you've"
been very concerned with.
I don't know if we'll have time to answer this,"
but I would like to get maybe one or two questions.'
And perhaps you could--
No, I think that's a good question in two parts"
that I'll answer it.
One is one of the things we have done quite consciously'
in the practice, which we continue to even do today,'
is have the same mix, which means that although we might'
now be doing one or two other institutional projects,'
but at any given time, we have a couple of small houses.'
We are doing some self-initiated projects.'
We are always engaged with a conservation project.'
We make a conscious effort to keep that basket of diversity'
of the projects alive.
And there are moments for a few years that you don't"
get a conservation project.
But we are always open to that.
And I think our constituency or the kinds of clients'
that one comes in contact with and also because of the books,'
which is what I think then becomes a way'
that you connect to the world, people'
come to you for those things.
And that's, I think, part of the way the practice"
is constructed.
And again, I see this so clearly in retrospect.'
But over the years, a lot of it has'
been intuitive in trying to create this mix.'
I think-- and one of the things I've"
tried to do in the exhibition is show'
the chronology of the writing, but also'
the images of the projects.
And again with retrospect, I can say this more confidently'
that the first 10 years of the practice,'
we got that one office building with the courtyards,'
which was lucky.
That client made us write in the contract'
they didn't want to publish it.
So we never got another big project'
because everyone thought we did houses.'
But the first 10 years of my practice,'
I was really making operational in Mumbai'
what I was trying to construct as urban design.'
Because that's what I had gone back"
with equipped and most excited about.'
And as I said in my talk here, I saw urban design'
as an advocacy practice, creating feedback loops,'
with the site-specificity of architecture'
and the abstraction of planning.
And 10 or 12 years, and that's where-- and you're right."
I mean, if I actually presented this chronologically, that'
becomes very evident because the conservation legislation'
we were doing, the post-industrial'
landscapes we were looking at, it'
had a lot to do with many complex issues which'
didn't result in building.
But it resulted in us being able to construct'
an imagination of what these constituencies are, how do you'
work with whom, and therefore bring a set of agendas, which'
then created a feedback to our own work when we--'
because we were trying to then create a consistency.'
So it's not consistency necessarily"
of architectural vocabulary, but it's"
a consistency of the concerns of creating what I'm now"
calling soft thresholds, or interconnectedness,'
or blurring polarities and not constructing binaries, which'
were very evident in our public projects, which were then'
brought to our architecture.
So actually, this has made me think--'
I never thought of it like that--'
is that if one really reframed this chronologically,'
I could tell the story quite differently.'
We'll follow up on this.
I'm very keen to see if there's any students."
I can't actually-- it's quite dark, so I can't quite see you."
But do I see any hands?
Or are you still--
great.
Are you still inspired by all that-- yes, we'
have we have someone who was not a student.'
But he's a student of-- yes, Professor Peiser."
In your community toilet--
well, first, it's just a brilliant, wonderful"
presentation.
But in the community toilets that you'
said were such a failure, and part of it'
was who the caretaker was, if you were to do it again'
differently, what would you do?
Which is what we tried to do with the competition--'
of course, the given would be to find a way of actually engaging'
more directly with the community we were serving'
and whatever that might involve.
I think that was a given.
That detachment when I realized that was--'
we were impatient about building a prototype.'
And that, I think, did it under.
The other would be to make it more reversible,'
to really make an expression of what is a transitional move.'
And I think that would allow for its intervention'
and many other permutations to occur in terms of design.'
And I think that really, for me, would be the two'
things that I would go back to.
But I think what I learned from it--'
and this is just given the context of Mumbai.'
In another context, it might be different.'
So making explicit it's reversibility"
so it's not an obtrusion for the community but also making"
links with the community.
And I think design can play--
to give expression to that can be a very powerful instrument'
in making it happen.
But what I learned from it is that really, I'
would struggle with it.
I spent two years where I didn't know how to deal with the fact"
that it was a failure.
And often, I've shown it in architecture schools."
And I've provoked the deans or the chairs or--"
too, it would be interesting if we actually did'
a conference, a one-day conference on failure,'
and got all the big guys who come here to present all'
their glamorous work, which we can't believe how they've"
achieved those amazing images of beautiful projects'
to come and just present a project that they think'
completely failed and try to deconstruct that process.'
It might be useful.
And I mean, what I'm trying to say"
is we don't have a vocabulary to discuss failure."
And therefore, we don't learn from it so easily,"
except at an emotive level or in the level of some protocols'
that we might follow.
But I think it has to be a deeper learning.'
Yes, back there.
Wait for the mic.
Yeah.
Sorry.
Hi.
I was really interested in how you're"
talking about bringing together the powerful versus the most'
powerful, like the gardeners with the office workers.'
And I guess I was wondering if you'
think architects should bring--
let me see how to say this.
The gardeners are still being paid the lowest,'
even though they're standing right next to the office"
workers, right?
And I guess, is there a way for architects to empower--'
actually give more power to the gardeners'
in terms of how they're living and how much they're"
getting paid?
And do you think architects should be a part of that?'
Like, should that be a part of the architect's sphere"
of influence?
So the short answer is communism.'
[laughter]
The longer answer would be--
I mean, I think it's a political question, no?"
Then I think it's a matter of how, as architects, you also"
have a position politically.
So I think the point I'm making is yes, you"
can become political, become a politician,'
begin to engage with those kinds of questions.'
Or you can engage with trying to imagine spatial possibilities'
that might allow that to happen or that might facilitate it.'
So I would argue that the gardeners there, first of all,'
they have-- there's a lot of empathy for them."
They have great dignity, which they want.'
Usually in one of those glass blocks,'
you have a lawn outside.
Gardeners would be working, sitting on their haunches.'
People would drive by in their cars.'
There would be with no eye contact.'
And you go to their website.
I mean, I don't know if this is when we did the building."
The relationships between some of the people working there'
and the gardeners is amazing.
They would be selling them bouquets of flowers on the side'
if they forgot something for someone's anniversary."
They were catching butterflies for their children's biology"
classes.
There was already-- now, that is a beginning.'
Because through that communication and this dignity,'
there is empowerment, because there's communication."
So it's much more subtle.
Maybe it's intangible and subjective."
But I think space can play a big role in that'
if we identify and articulate the problems in that way.'
And then, of course, there are other extreme ways'
of dealing with it, which are more political.'
So I think your question is not dissimilar to what'
I'm hoping we will be able to follow up on,"
what I was trying to ask about the role of practice.'
Because one of the things that you could say'
is that in the context of a US practice,'
you could show the same photograph'
with the architect outside and the lawyer'
or whoever else, the businessman, inside.'
And the architect would play the role of the gardener.'
So there are those societal hierarchies that are in place.'
But also in the context of the organization of the office,'
the people who actually write the reports'
and do the conservation projects sometimes'
are slightly in a different position'
than the person who is in a highly technical situation'
and delivering very sophisticated buildings.'
So there is an issue in terms of how'
one is able to sustain that kind of practice,'
for example in the US or in Europe, which may be possible'
now in India.
But it's actually a conundrum in terms"
of the complexities of capital, the organization, the salaries,'
and all of these kinds of things.'
So that, I think, would be a good thing for us to maybe--'
In fact, that's a good-- you know,"
our studio is about 21 people now, 20, 21,'
something like that.
It's about eight architects that are qualified architects."
And the rest are a whole array of people'
who've worked their way up, from tea makers and career boys"
to model makers to--
it actually gives us-- so when we do these measured drawings,'
for example, that I was showing you,'
it's not all the slick architects who all necessarily"
go.
But it's a whole group of people which"
give different access in terms of information gathering'
and all of that.
So I think that's a whole discussion in itself."
Anyway Rahul, thank you very, very'
much for a wonderful lecture.
Please join us for the reception outside.'
